Washington statutes.
RCW 42.16.017

Payroll preparation and accounting—Establishment of policies, procedures, and paydates.

The director of financial management shall adopt the necessary policies and procedures to implement RCW 42.16.010 through 42.16.017, including the establishment of paydates. Such paydates shall conform to RCW 42.16.010. The director of financial management shall have approval over all agency and state payroll systems and shall determine the payroll systems to be used by state agencies to ensure the implementation of RCW 42.16.010 and 41.04.232: PROVIDED, That for purposes of the central personnel payroll system, the provisions of RCW 41.07.020 shall apply.

[ 1998 c 245 s 45; 1983 1st ex.s. c 28 s 6; 1979 c 151 s 72; 1967 ex.s. c 25 s 8.]

NOTES:

Application—1983 1st ex.s. c 28: See note following RCW 42.16.010.